incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="w/U__p">
      <e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Une</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uJe</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uJako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uJase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uJameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uJapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uma</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umane </l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umheM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umako</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umase</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umameM</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umapara</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erA</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ere</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhArA</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhAre</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umhArI</l><r>U<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Apa/__p">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ko</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kexvArA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>meM</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>para</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kA</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kI</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kI</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kI</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kI</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Apa"><i>Apa</i><par n="Apa/__p"/></e>
    <e lm="wU"><i>w</i><par n="w/U__p"/></e>
